Nevada, session 83, SB86.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any provider of health care who in good faith performs a
forensic medical examination or strangulation forensic medical
examination is not liable for any civil damages as a result of any
act or omission, not amounting to gross negligence, in performing
the examination or providing or arranging for the provision of
further medical treatment for the victim on whom the examination
is performed.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 217.300.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Strangulation forensic medical examination” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 217.405.
H
-
*SB86*